st.aff
FLAG long
SFX tA Y 44
SFX tA re re/ [dp]re # po:infi
SFX tA re ant/ [dp]re # po:ppre
SFX tA re u/ [dp]re # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX tA re us/ [dp]re # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX tA re ue/ [dp]re # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX tA re ues/ [dp]re # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX tA re s/ [dp]re # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tA dre d/ dre # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX tA pre pt/ pre # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX tA re ons/ [dp]re # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX tA re ez/ [dp]re # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX tA re ent/ [dp]re # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX tA re ais/ [dp]re # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tA re ait/ [dp]re # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX tA re ions/ [dp]re # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX tA re iez/ [dp]re # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX tA re aient/ [dp]re # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX tA re is/ [dp]re # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tA re it/ [dp]re # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX tA re îmes/ [dp]re # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX tA re îtes/ [dp]re # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX tA re irent/ [dp]re # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX tA re rai/ [dp]re # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX tA re ras/ [dp]re # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX tA re ra/ [dp]re # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX tA re rons/ [dp]re # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX tA re rez/ [dp]re # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX tA re ront/ [dp]re # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX tA re rais/ [dp]re # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tA re rait/ [dp]re # po:cond po:3sg
SFX tA re rions/ [dp]re # po:cond po:1pl
SFX tA re riez/ [dp]re # po:cond po:2pl
SFX tA re raient/ [dp]re # po:cond po:3pl
SFX tA re e/ [dp]re # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX tA re es/ [dp]re # po:spre po:2sg
SFX tA re isse/ [dp]re # po:simp po:1sg
SFX tA re isses/ [dp]re # po:simp po:2sg
SFX tA re ît/ [dp]re # po:simp po:3sg
SFX tA re issions/ [dp]re # po:simp po:1pl
SFX tA re issiez/ [dp]re # po:simp po:2pl
SFX tA re issent/ [dp]re # po:simp po:3pl
SFX tA re s/ [dp]re # po:impe po:2sg
SFX tA re ons/ [dp]re # po:impe po:1pl
SFX tA re ez/ [dp]re # po:impe po:2pl

SFX tD Y 43
SFX tD perdre perdre/ perdre # po:infi
SFX tD perdre perdant/ perdre # po:ppre
SFX tD perdre perdu/ perdre # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:sg
SFX tD perdre perdus/ perdre # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:pl
SFX tD perdre perdue/ perdre # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX tD perdre perdues/ perdre # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX tD perdre perds/ perdre # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tD perdre perd/ perdre # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX tD perdre perdons/ perdre # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX tD perdre perdez/ perdre # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX tD perdre perdent/ perdre # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX tD perdre perdais/ perdre # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tD perdre perdait/ perdre # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX tD perdre perdions/ perdre # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX tD perdre perdiez/ perdre # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX tD perdre perdaient/ perdre # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX tD perdre perdis/ perdre # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tD perdre perdit/ perdre # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX tD perdre perdîmes/ perdre # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX tD perdre perdîtes/ perdre # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX tD perdre perdirent/ perdre # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX tD perdre perdrai/ perdre # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX tD perdre perdras/ perdre # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX tD perdre perdra/ perdre # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX tD perdre perdrons/ perdre # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX tD perdre perdrez/ perdre # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX tD perdre perdront/ perdre # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX tD perdre perdrais/ perdre # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tD perdre perdrait/ perdre # po:cond po:3sg
SFX tD perdre perdrions/ perdre # po:cond po:1pl
SFX tD perdre perdriez/ perdre # po:cond po:2pl
SFX tD perdre perdraient/ perdre # po:cond po:3pl
SFX tD perdre perde/ perdre # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX tD perdre perdes/ perdre # po:spre po:2sg
SFX tD perdre perdisse/ perdre # po:simp po:1sg
SFX tD perdre perdisses/ perdre # po:simp po:2sg
SFX tD perdre perdît/ perdre # po:simp po:3sg
SFX tD perdre perdissions/ perdre # po:simp po:1pl
SFX tD perdre perdissiez/ perdre # po:simp po:2pl
SFX tD perdre perdissent/ perdre # po:simp po:3pl
SFX tD perdre perds/ perdre # po:impe po:2sg
SFX tD perdre perdons/ perdre # po:impe po:1pl
SFX tD perdre perdez/ perdre # po:impe po:2pl

SFX tE Y 39
SFX tE dre dre/ dre # po:infi
SFX tE dre dant/ dre # po:ppre
SFX tE dre ds/ dre # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tE dre d/ dre # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX tE dre dons/ dre # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX tE dre dez/ dre # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX tE dre dent/ dre # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX tE dre dais/ dre # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tE dre dait/ dre # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX tE dre dions/ dre # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX tE dre diez/ dre # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX tE dre daient/ dre # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX tE dre dis/ dre # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tE dre dit/ dre # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX tE dre dîmes/ dre # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX tE dre dîtes/ dre # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX tE dre dirent/ dre # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX tE dre drai/ dre # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX tE dre dras/ dre # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX tE dre dra/ dre # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX tE dre drons/ dre # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX tE dre drez/ dre # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX tE dre dront/ dre # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX tE dre drais/ dre # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tE dre drait/ dre # po:cond po:3sg
SFX tE dre drions/ dre # po:cond po:1pl
SFX tE dre driez/ dre # po:cond po:2pl
SFX tE dre draient/ dre # po:cond po:3pl
SFX tE dre de/ dre # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX tE dre des/ dre # po:spre po:2sg
SFX tE dre disse/ dre # po:simp po:1sg
SFX tE dre disses/ dre # po:simp po:2sg
SFX tE dre dît/ dre # po:simp po:3sg
SFX tE dre dissions/ dre # po:simp po:1pl
SFX tE dre dissiez/ dre # po:simp po:2pl
SFX tE dre dissent/ dre # po:simp po:3pl
SFX tE dre ds/ dre # po:impe po:2sg
SFX tE dre dons/ dre # po:impe po:1pl
SFX tE dre dez/ dre # po:impe po:2pl

SFX tF Y 42
SFX tF rendre rendre/ prendre # po:infi
SFX tF rendre renant/ prendre # po:ppre
SFX tF rendre ris/ prendre # po:ppas po:adj is:mas is:inv
SFX tF rendre rise/ prendre # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:sg
SFX tF rendre rises/ prendre # po:ppas po:adj is:fem is:pl
SFX tF rendre rends/ prendre # po:ipre po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tF rendre rend/ prendre # po:ipre po:3sg
SFX tF rendre renons/ prendre # po:ipre po:1pl
SFX tF rendre renez/ prendre # po:ipre po:2pl
SFX tF rendre rennent/ prendre # po:ipre po:spre po:3pl
SFX tF rendre renais/ prendre # po:iimp po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tF rendre renait/ prendre # po:iimp po:3sg
SFX tF rendre renions/ prendre # po:iimp po:spre po:1pl
SFX tF rendre reniez/ prendre # po:iimp po:spre po:2pl
SFX tF rendre renaient/ prendre # po:iimp po:3pl
SFX tF rendre ris/ prendre # po:ipsi po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tF rendre rit/ prendre # po:ipsi po:3sg
SFX tF rendre rîmes/ prendre # po:ipsi po:1pl
SFX tF rendre rîtes/ prendre # po:ipsi po:2pl
SFX tF rendre rirent/ prendre # po:ipsi po:3pl!
SFX tF rendre rendrai/ prendre # po:ifut po:1sg
SFX tF rendre rendras/ prendre # po:ifut po:2sg
SFX tF rendre rendra/ prendre # po:ifut po:3sg
SFX tF rendre rendrons/ prendre # po:ifut po:1pl
SFX tF rendre rendrez/ prendre # po:ifut po:2pl
SFX tF rendre rendront/ prendre # po:ifut po:3pl!
SFX tF rendre rendrais/ prendre # po:cond po:1sg po:2sg
SFX tF rendre rendrait/ prendre # po:cond po:3sg
SFX tF rendre rendrions/ prendre # po:cond po:1pl
SFX tF rendre rendriez/ prendre # po:cond po:2pl
SFX tF rendre rendraient/ prendre # po:cond po:3pl
SFX tF rendre renne/ prendre # po:spre po:1sg po:3sg
SFX tF rendre rennes/ prendre # po:spre po:2sg
SFX tF rendre risse/ prendre # po:simp po:1sg
SFX tF rendre risses/ prendre # po:simp po:2sg
SFX tF rendre rît/ prendre # po:simp po:3sg
SFX tF rendre rissions/ prendre # po:simp po:1pl
SFX tF rendre rissiez/ prendre # po:simp po:2pl
SFX tF rendre rissent/ prendre # po:simp po:3pl
SFX tF rendre rends/ prendre # po:impe po:2sg
SFX tF rendre renons/ prendre # po:impe po:1pl
SFX tF rendre renez/ prendre # po:impe po:2pl
