st.dic
appendre/tA  # po:v3__t____a
apprendre/tF  # po:v3_itn___a
attendre/tA  # po:v3_itxq__a
comprendre/tF  # po:v3_it_q__a
condescendre/tEq.  # po:v3___n___a
confondre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
correspondre/tEq.  # po:v3_i_nx__a
corrompre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
défendre/tA  # po:v3_itnq__a
démordre/tEq.  # po:v3___x___a
dépendre/tA  # po:v3_itx___a
désapprendre/tF  # po:v3_it____a
descendre/tA  # po:v3_it____a
détendre/tA  # po:v3__t_q__a
détordre/tA  # po:v3__t_q__a
distendre/tA  # po:v3__t_q__a
distordre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
entendre/tA  # po:v3_itnq__a
entreprendre/tF  # po:v3_it____a
épandre/tA  # po:v3__t_q__a
éperdre/tD  # po:v3____p_e_
étendre/tA  # po:v3__t_q__a
fendre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
fondre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
interrompre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
mévendre/tA  # po:v3__t_q__a
mordre/tA  # po:v3_itxq__a
morfondre/tEq+  # po:v3____p_e_
parfondre/tA  # po:v3_it_x__a
pendre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
perdre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
pondre/tA  # po:v3_it____a
pourfendre/tA  # po:v3_it____a
prendre/tF  # po:v3_itnq__a
prétendre/tA  # po:v3__tnq__a
rapprendre/tF  # po:v3_itn___a
réapprendre/tF  # po:v3_itn___a
redescendre/tA  # po:v3_it____a
réentendre/tA  # po:v3_itxq__a
refendre/tA  # po:v3_it____a
refondre/tA  # po:v3_it____a
remordre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
rendre/tA  # po:v3_itnq__a
répandre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
rependre/tA  # po:v3__t____a
reperdre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
répondre/tA  # po:v3_ixn___a
reprendre/tF  # po:v3_itnq__a
retendre/tA  # po:v3__t____a
retondre/tA  # po:v3_it____a
retordre/tA  # po:v3__t____a
revendre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
rompre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
surprendre/tF  # po:v3_it_q__a
surtendre/tA  # po:v3__t____a
survendre/tA  # po:v3_itnq__a
suspendre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
tendre/tA  # po:v3__tnq__a
tondre/tA  # po:v3_it____a
tordre/tA  # po:v3_it_q__a
vendre/tA  # po:v3_itnq__a
